Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-618
Act, how interpreted.

Nothing in the Certified Nurse Midwifery Practice Act shall be interpreted to permit independent practice.

Laws 1984, LB 761, § 26;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1763;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 230.